Colorado, session 2026A, SB108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-6-204 as
follows:
24-6-204. Reporting by legislative groups - receipts and
expenditures - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "LEGISLATIVE GROUP" MEANS ANY CAUCUS, COMMITTEE, CLUB,
ORGANIZATION, OR GROUP THAT CONSISTS OF ONE OR MORE LEGISLATIVE
MEMBERS AND ACCEPTS, RECEIVES, OR EXPENDS MONEY AT ANY TIME.
"LEGISLATIVE GROUP" DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY COMMITTEE, BOARD, OR
COMMISSION THAT IS CREATED BY STATUTE OR LEGISLATIVE RULE, OR TO
WHICH LEGISLATORS ARE APPOINTED BY LEGISLATIVE LEADERSHIP.
(b) "LEGISLATIVE MEMBER" MEANS A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY WHO IS ALSO A MEMBER OF A LEGISLATIVE GROUP.
(2) ONE LEGISLATIVE MEMBER FROM EACH LEGISLATIVE GROUP
SHALL DELIVER TO THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF, ON OR BEFORE THE
TENTH DAY OF EACH MONTH SUCCEEDING A MONTH IN WHICH THE
LEGISLATIVE GROUP WAS ACTIVE, A REPORT THAT INCLUDES RECEIPTS
-2- SB26-108

LISTING ALL MONEY AND ITEMS THAT THE LEGISLATIVE GROUP RECEIVED,
ACCEPTED, OR EXPENDED DURING THE PREVIOUS MONTH. THE
LEGISLATIVE MEMBER SHALL DELIVER THE REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL STAFF IN A MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
STAFF.
(3) EACH LEGISLATIVE GROUP SHALL PROVIDE THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL STAFF WITH ACCURATE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE GROUP
AND SHALL PROMPTLY INFORM THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF OF ANY
CHANGES TO THAT CONTACT INFORMATION. THE CONTACT INFORMATION
MUST INCLUDE THE LEGISLATIVE GROUP'S:
(a) OFFICIAL NAME;
(b) MAILING ADDRESS;
(c) PRIMARY EMAIL ADDRESS; AND
(d) DESIGNATED LEGISLATIVE MEMBER WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO
SEND AND RECEIVE OFFICIAL COMMUNICATIONS ON BEHALF OF THE
LEGISLATIVE GROUP, INCLUDING THE MEMBER'S CONTACT INFORMATION.
(4) A RECEIPT LISTING MONEY THAT A LEGISLATIVE GROUP
RECEIVED OR ACCEPTED AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION
MUST INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM:
(a) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE DONOR;
(b) THE AMOUNT OF MONEY RECEIVED OR ACCEPTED; AND
(c) THE DATE THE MONEY WAS RECEIVED OR ACCEPTED.
(5) THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL POST EACH REPORT
RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION ON A PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE PAGE ON THE WEBSITE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY. THE
LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL REDACT FROM EACH REPORT THE
ADDRESS OF EACH DONOR TO A LEGISLATIVE GROUP BEFORE THE REPORT
-3- SB26-108

IS POSTED.
(6) A REPORT REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION NEED
NOT INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:
(a) MONEY OR CONTRIBUTIONS THAT MUST BE REPORTED
PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 45 OF TITLE 1; OR
(b) MONEY APPROPRIATED THROUGH AN ACT OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
(7) ANY PERSON WHO PROVIDES A LEGISLATIVE GROUP WITH AN
ITEM SHALL, AT THE TIME THE ITEM IS PROVIDED, FURNISH THE
LEGISLATIVE GROUP WITH A WRITTEN STATEMENT OF THE DOLLAR VALUE
OF THE ITEM.
(8) A LEGISLATIVE GROUP THAT DOES NOT RECEIVE, ACCEPT, OR
EXPEND ANY MONEY IN A MONTH SHALL FILE A NO ACTIVITY REPORT AS
PRESCRIBED BY THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF ON THE TENTH DAY OF
THE FOLLOWING MONTH.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-4- SB26-108